src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-82andma_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `andma: # Verb (82) `andma 'eng give /est andma/fin antaa' - full paradigm
     andma+V+Inf/mA: andma
     andma+V+Inf: andaq
     andma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: andnuq
     andma+V+Pss+PrfPrc: annõt

     andma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: anna
     andma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: annat
     andma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: and
     andma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: annamiq
     andma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: annatiq
     andma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: andvaq
     andma+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: anna
     andma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: anni
     andma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: annit
     andma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: and́
     andma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: annimiq
     andma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: annitiq
     andma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: anniq

     andma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: annõda
     andma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: annõtas

     andma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: andva

     andma+V+Jus: andkuq
